Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 21.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-408.01
Children's day health service,
defined.

(1)
Children's day health service means a person or any legal entity which provides
specialized care and treatment, including an array of social, medical, rehabilitation,
or other support services for a period of less than twenty-four consecutive
hours in a community-based group program to twenty or more persons under twenty-one
years of age who require such services due to medical dependence, birth trauma,
congenital anomalies, developmental disorders, or functional impairment.

(2) Children's
day health service does not include services provided under the Developmental
Disabilities Services Act.

Laws 2010, LB849, § 21.

Developmental Disabilities Services Act, see section 83-1201.